District of Columbia statutes.
10-620

Construction Services Fund.

(a)

There is established in the Treasury of the United States a permanent working fund, without fiscal year limitation, to be known as the Construction Services Fund, Department of General Services, District of Columbia. The Mayor is authorized to transfer to such Fund from capital outlay appropriations for public building construction such amounts as he may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, and, subject to subsequent adjustment, advances and reimbursements may be made to such Fund from appropriations for services to other departments and agencies of the District government, without reference to fiscal year limitations on such appropriations. The Fund shall be available for expenses incurred in the initial planning for construction projects, for work performed under contract or otherwise, including, but not limited to, preliminary planning and related expenses, surveys, preparation of plans and specifications, soil investigation, administration, overhead, planning design, engineering, inspection, and contract management.

(b)

The Council of the District of Columbia shall annually review the budget of the Construction Services Fund within 90 days after the annual District of Columbia Appropriations Act is enacted into law.

(c)

The Council of the District of Columbia, the Board of Higher Education, the Board of Vocational Education, the Board of Education, the Public Library Board, and the Executive Director of the District of Columbia Court System shall be kept fully advised, at least semiannually, of the status of projects and activities within their respective areas of concern which are financed from the Construction Services Fund.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 506, Pub. L. 93-140, § 13
1981 Ed., § 9-220.
1973 Ed., § 9-221.
The functions of the Department of General Services were transferred, in part, to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, and transferred, in part, to the Department of Administrative Services by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.